Massachusetts, session 194th, S435.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 8A of chapter 90, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition of the General Laws,
is hereby amended by inserting after the second paragraph the following paragraph:- There shall
be training relative to de-escalation tactics and techniques approved by the commissioner of
education required for all school bus operators. If employed, the operator’s employer shall pay
for the cost of the de-escalation training.
of 1